Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE E. GOVERNMENT PROPERTY

CHAPTER 2203. USE OF STATE PROPERTY

Sec. 2203.002. STATE POSTAGE METERS. (a) A state department, board, commission, or educational institution that installs a postage meter shall place on the machine an imprint plate stating that:

(1) the mail carried by the postage is official state mail; and

(2) there is a penalty for the unlawful use of the postage meter for a private purpose.

(b) A state department, board, commission, or educational institution shall pay for the imprint plate and its installation from the state department's, board's, commission's, or educational institution's appropriation for postage and contingent expenses.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 2203.003. STATE PROPERTY UNDER CONTROL OF THE TEXAS DIVISION UNITED DAUGHTERS OF THE CONFEDERACY. (a) The Texas Division United Daughters of the Confederacy may charge admission to state property over which the organization has custody or control.

(b) An organization that charges admission under this section shall set the fee in an amount that it determines serves the best interest of the state and the public.

(c) The organization may maintain and operate, or may contract with another person for the operation of, a concession on state property under its control. The concession may be operated in any manner the organization considers necessary for the best interest of the state and the public.

(d) The organization shall hold separately in trust all admission fees and profits from the operation of concessions at each property. The money may be spent only to maintain and repair the state property and furnishings at the property at which the money is received.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1046 (H.B. 3726), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 3810), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 3810), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 2203.004. REQUIREMENT TO USE STATE PROPERTY FOR STATE PURPOSES. State property may be used only for state purposes. A person may not entrust state property to a state officer or employee or to any other person if the property is not to be used for state purposes.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1499, Sec. 1.33, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2203.005. VENDING MACHINES AUTHORIZED. (a) In a state-owned or state-leased building or on state-owned or state-leased property that is not served by a vendor operating under the supervision of the Texas Commission for the Blind, a vending machine may be located in the building or on the property only with the approval of the governing body of the state agency that has charge and control of the building or property. The approval must be recorded in the minutes of a meeting of the governing body.

(b) The state agency shall file with the comptroller a copy of all contracts between the state agency and the vendor related to the vending machine and a written description of the location of the vending machine.

(c) All rentals, commissions, or other net revenue the state agency receives in connection with the vending machine shall be accounted for as state money and deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund unless the disposition of the revenue is governed by other law. The state agency shall account for the revenue received under this section in the agency's annual report.

(d) In a state-owned or state-leased building or on state-owned or state-leased property that is served by a vendor operating under the supervision of the Texas Commission for the Blind, a vending machine may be located and operated in the building or on the property only under a joint contract with the owners of the vending machine and the vendor operating under the supervision of the Texas Commission for the Blind.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1499, Sec. 1.33, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.70, eff. September 1, 2007.